Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-1105
Approval of viatical settlement contracts and disclosure statements.

A person shall not use a viatical settlement contract form or provide to a viator a disclosure statement form in this state unless first filed with and approved by the director. The director shall disapprove a viatical settlement contract form or disclosure statement form if, in the director's opinion, the contract or provisions contained therein fail to meet the requirements of sections 44-1108, 44-1109, and 44-1111 and subsection (2) of section 44-1112 or are unreasonable, contrary to the interest of the public, or otherwise misleading or unfair to the viator. At the director's discretion, the director may require the submission of advertising material.

Laws 2001, LB 52, § 31;

Laws 2008, LB853, § 5.